Utah statutes.
53B-22-109.   Salt Lake Community College revenue bonds -- Science/major
industry building.
(1)  The State Board of Regents, on behalf of Salt Lake Community College, may
issue, sell, and deliver revenue bonds or other evidences of indebtedness of
Salt Lake Community College to borrow money on the credit of the income and
revenues of Salt Lake Community College, other than appropriations of the
Legislature, to finance the partial cost of constructing, furnishing, and
equipping a science/major industry building.
(2)  The bonds or other evidences of indebtedness authorized by this section
may not exceed $5,150,000 and shall be issued in accordance with Title 53B,
Chapter 21, Revenue Bonds, under terms and conditions and in amounts that the
board, by resolution, determines are reasonable and necessary.
